Hawaii statutes.
§88-164 Benefits in lieu of other payments.
The benefits set forth in this part shall be in lieu of any or other
compensation payable to a member of a police force, fire department, or band or
any of the member's dependents under or on account of chapter 386, or any other
claim or demand against the county by whom the member is employed. However,
the member of the police force, fire department, or band or the member's
dependents may, at the member's or their election, waive the benefit provided
for in this part and in lieu thereof claim any compensation or benefits that
would otherwise be payable to the member or the member's dependents under
chapter 386, or in any manner authorized by law. [L 1917, c 220, pt of §3; am L
1923, c 99, pt of §2; RL 1925, pt of §2163; am L 1929, c 9, pt of §1; RL 1935,
pt of §7905; RL 1945, pt of §6173; RL 1955, §6-144; HRS §88-164; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next